New Jersey, session 222, S1374.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The board of education of a school district shall, at a minimum, employ and assign on a fulltime basis to each school within the school district at least one school psychologist.  The maximum student to school psychologist ratio per school in a school district shall be 500:1. b.    A school district shall apply for any federal funds which may be available to implement, or to aid in implementing, the provisions of this section. c.    As used in this section, school psychologist means a person who holds a New Jersey standard educational services certificate with a school psychologist endorsement. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply in the second full school year next following the date of enactment.